Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1241YH (4) 91 lh/ko H.F. 183 Section 1. Section 155A.46, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. (1) A pharmacist may, pursuant to 3 statewide protocols developed by the board in consultation with 4 the department of health and human services and consistent with 5 subsection 3, do all of the following: 6 (a) Order and administer point-of-care HIV-related tests. 7 (b) Order and administer or dispense HIV pre-exposure 8 prophylaxis or HIV post-exposure prophylaxis. 9 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of a health benefit plan 10 to the contrary, if a health benefit plan provides for payment 11 or reimbursement for a service that is within the lawful scope 12 of practice of a practitioner or a pharmacist, and a service 13 is provided by a pharmacist pursuant to a statewide protocol 14 under this paragraph, the health carrier that issued the health 15 benefit plan shall provide payment or reimbursement for the 16 service. 17 (3) For the purposes of this paragraph: 18 (a) âHealth benefit planâ means the same as defined in 19 section 514J.102. 20 (b) âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 21 514J.102. 22 (c) âHIVâ means the same as defined in section 141A.1. 23 (d) âHIV-related testâ means the same as defined in section 24 141A.1. 25